Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1724
Code, how construed.

The Commodity Code may be construed and implemented to effectuate its general purpose to protect investors, to prevent and prosecute illegal and fraudulent schemes involving commodity contracts, and to maximize coordination with federal and other states' law and the administration and enforcement thereof.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 24;

Laws 1993, LB 283, § 8.